Utah statutes.
58-9-706.   Trust funds and insurance reports.

(1) (a)  Each funeral service establishment shall maintain an annual report of preneed trust funds and insurance.

(b)  The report shall contain:

(i)  the name of the trustees with which the funeral service establishment has trust funds on deposit; and

(ii)  the amount remaining on deposit in the trust fund on:

(A)  December 31 of the preceding year; or

(B)  another annual reporting period as the division may establish.

(2)  Each funeral service establishment may be audited by the division at any time.



Amended by Chapter 144, 2007 General Session

